New Jersey, session 222, A2458.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2022, c.49, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Education Services 2410 Rutgers, The State University  New Brunswick GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2410  Institutional Support ............................................... $350,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rutgers, The State University  New Brunswick .................... $350,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82    Center for American Women and Politics  Women Elected and Appointed Officials Database................................. ($350,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.